District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.35

Maintenance of documents.

Copies of the specimen bonds and of the final Financing Documents and Closing Documents shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-254, § 2(b), 55 DCR 9275